Missouri, session 2026, HB3133.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 149.015, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 149.015, to read as follows:
149.015. 1. Except as provided in subsection 9 of this section, a tax shall be levied
upon the sale of cigarettes at an amount equal to eight and one-half mills per cigarette, until
such time as the general assembly appropriates an amount equal to twenty-five percent of the
net federal reimbursement allowance to the health initiatives fund, then the tax shall be six
and one-half mills per cigarette beginning July first of the fiscal year immediately after such
appropriation. As used in this section, "net federal reimbursement allowance" shall mean that
amount of the federal reimbursement allowance in excess of the amount of state matching
funds necessary for the state to make payments required by subsection 1 of section 208.471
or, if the payments exceed the amount so required, the actual payments made for the purposes
specified in subsection 1 of section 208.471.
2. The tax shall be evidenced by stamps which shall be furnished by and purchased
from the director or by an impression of the tax by the use of a metering machine when
authorized by the director as provided in this chapter, and the stamps or impression shall be
securely affixed to one end of each package in which cigarettes are contained. All cigarettes
must be stamped before being sold in this state.
3. Cigarette tax stamps shall be purchased only from the director. All stamps shall be
purchased by the director in proper denominations, shall contain such appropriate wording as
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3133 2
the director may prescribe, and shall be of such design, character, color combinations, color
changes, sizes and material as the director may, by rules and regulations, determine to afford
the greatest security to the state. It shall be the duty of the director to manufacture or contract
for revenue stamps required by this chapter; provided that if the stamps are contracted for, the
manufacturer thereof shall be within the jurisdiction of the criminal and civil courts of this
state, unless the stamps cannot be obtained in this state at a fair price or of acceptable quality.
If stamps are manufactured outside of the state, the director shall take any precautions which
he deems necessary to safeguard the state against forgery and misdelivery of any stamps. The
director may require of the manufacturer from whom stamps are purchased a bond in an
amount to be determined by him commensurate with the monetary value of the stamps,
containing such conditions as he may deem necessary in order to protect the state against loss.
4. It shall be the intent of this chapter that the impact of the tax levied hereunder be
absorbed by the consumer or user and when the tax is paid by any other person, the payment
shall be considered as an advance payment and shall thereafter be added to the price of the
cigarettes and recovered from the ultimate consumer or user with the person first selling the
cigarettes acting as an agent of the state for the payment and collection of the tax to the state,
except that in furtherance of the intent of this chapter no refund of any tax collected and
remitted by a retailer upon gross receipts from a sale of cigarettes subject to tax pursuant to
this chapter shall be claimed pursuant to chapter 144 for any amount illegally or erroneously
overcharged or overcollected as a result of imposition of sales tax by the retailer upon
amounts representing the tax imposed pursuant to this chapter and any such tax shall either be
refunded to the person who paid such tax or paid to the director. The director may recoup
from any retailer any tax illegally or erroneously overcharged or overcollected unless such tax
has been refunded to the person who paid such tax.
5. In making sales of cigarettes in the state, a wholesaler shall keep a record of the
amount of tax on his gross sales. The tax shall be evidenced by appropriate stamps attached
to each package of cigarettes sold. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no tax
stamp need be attached to a package of cigarettes transported in the state between wholesalers
or distributors unless and until such package is sold to a retailer or consumer.
6. The tax on any cigarettes contained in packages of four, ten, twenty or similar
quantities to be used solely for distribution as samples shall be computed on a per cigarette
basis at the rate set forth in this section, and payment of the tax shall be remitted to the
director at such time and in such manner as he may prescribe.
7. The revenue generated by the additional two mills tax imposed effective August
13, 1982, less any three percent reduction allowed pursuant to the provisions of section
149.021, shall be placed in a separate fund entitled "The Fair Share Fund". Such moneys in

HB 3133 3
the fair share fund shall be transferred monthly to the state school moneys fund and
distributed to the school districts in this state as provided in section 163.031.
8. The revenue generated by the additional two mills tax imposed effective October 1,
1993, less any three percent reduction allowed pursuant to the provisions of section 149.021,
shall be deposited in the health initiatives fund created in section 191.831. When the general
assembly appropriates an amount equal to twenty-five percent of the net federal
reimbursement allowance to the health initiatives fund, this subsection shall expire. The
additional two mills tax levied pursuant to this section shall not apply to an amount of
stamped cigarettes in the possession of licensed wholesalers on October 1, 1993, up to thirty-
five percent of the total cigarette sales made by such licensed wholesaler during the six
months immediately preceding October 1, 1993.
9. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, in addition to the tax levied on the sale of
cigarettes in subsection 1 of this section, a tax shall be levied upon the sale of cigarettes
at an amount equal to sixty-six and one-half mills per cigarette.
(2) The revenue generated by the additional tax imposed under this subsection,
less any three percent reduction allowed under the provisions of section 149.021, shall be
deposited in the state general revenue fund.
(3) The additional tax imposed under this subsection shall apply only to stamps
purchased on or after the effective date of this section. For a period up to six months
prior to the effective date of a tax modification under this subsection, licensees shall not
be allowed to purchase stamps in a number greater than one hundred ten percent of the
number that were purchased by such licensee during the same period in the preceding
year.
Section B. Section A of this act is hereby submitted to the qualified voters of this state
for approval or rejection at an election which is hereby ordered and which shall be held and
conducted on Tuesday next following the first Monday in November, 2026, under the
applicable laws and constitutional provisions of this state for the submission of referendum
measures by the general assembly, and this act shall become effective when approved by a
majority of the votes cast thereon at such election and not otherwise.
✔